Missouri, session 2026, HB1782.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 135.647, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 135.647, to read as follows:
135.647. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Local food pantry", any food pantry that is:
(a) Exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended; and
(b) Distributing emergency food supplies to Missouri low-income people who would
otherwise not have access to food supplies in the area in which the taxpayer claiming the tax
credit under this section resides;
(2) "Local homeless shelter", any homeless shelter that is:
(a) Exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended; and
(b) Providing temporary living arrangements, in the area in which the taxpayer
claiming the tax credit under this section resides, for individuals and families who otherwise
lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence and lack the resources or support
networks to obtain other permanent housing;
(3) "Local soup kitchen", any soup kitchen that is:
(a) Exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1782 2
(b) Providing prepared meals through an established congregate feeding operation to
needy, low-income persons including, but not limited to, homeless persons in the area in
which the taxpayer claiming the tax credit under this section resides;
(4) "Taxpayer", an individual, a firm, a partner in a firm, corporation, or a shareholder
in an S corporation doing business in this state and subject to the state income tax imposed by
chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265.
2. (1) Beginning on March 29, 2013, any donation of cash or food made to a local
food pantry on or after January 1, 2013, unless such food is donated after the food's expiration
date, shall be eligible for tax credits as provided by this section.
(2) Beginning on August 28, 2018, any donation of cash or food made to a local soup
kitchen or local homeless shelter on or after January 1, 2018, unless such food is donated after
the food's expiration date, shall be eligible for a tax credit as provided under this section.
(3) Any taxpayer who makes a donation that is eligible for a tax credit under this
section shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, in an amount equal to fifty percent
of the value of the donations made to the extent such amounts that have been subtracted from
federal adjusted gross income or federal taxable income are added back in the determination
of Missouri adjusted gross income or Missouri taxable income before the credit can be
claimed. Each taxpayer claiming a tax credit under this section shall file an affidavit with the
income tax return verifying the amount of their contributions. The amount of the tax credit
claimed shall not exceed the amount of the taxpayer's state tax liability for the tax year that
the credit is claimed and shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars per taxpayer
claiming the credit. Any amount of credit that the taxpayer is prohibited by this section from
claiming in a tax year shall not be refundable, but may be carried forward to any of the
taxpayer's three subsequent tax years. No tax credit granted under this section shall be
transferred, sold, or assigned. No taxpayer shall be eligible to receive a credit pursuant to this
section if such taxpayer employs persons who are not authorized to work in the United States
under federal law. No taxpayer shall be able to claim more than one credit under this section
for a single donation.
3. The cumulative amount of tax credits under this section which may be allocated to
all taxpayers contributing to a local food pantry, local soup kitchen, or local homeless shelter
in any one fiscal year shall not exceed one million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars. The
director of revenue shall establish a procedure by which the cumulative amount of tax credits
is apportioned among all taxpayers claiming the credit by April fifteenth of the fiscal year in
which the tax credit is claimed. To the maximum extent possible, the director of revenue shall
establish the procedure described in this subsection in such a manner as to ensure that

HB 1782 3
taxpayers can claim all the tax credits possible up to the cumulative amount of tax credits
available for the fiscal year.
4. Any local food pantry, local soup kitchen, or local homeless shelter may accept or
reject any donation of food made under this section for any reason. For purposes of this
section, any donations of food accepted by a local food pantry, local soup kitchen, or local
homeless shelter shall be valued at fair market value, or at wholesale value if the taxpayer
making the donation of food is a retail grocery store, food broker, wholesaler, or restaurant.
5. The department of revenue shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2007, shall be invalid
and void.
6. [Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The program authorized under this section shall be reauthorized as of August 28,
2018, and shall expire on December 31, 2026, unless reauthorized by the general assembly;
and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this section is sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit or in any way
impair a taxpayer's ability to redeem tax credits authorized on or before the date the program
authorized under this section expires.] This section shall not be subject to the provisions of
the Missouri sunset act under sections 23.250 to 23.298.
✔